District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.23

Rules; orders.

(a)

The Commissioner, through the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The Commissioner may issue orders to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2164, 57 DCR 6242

History

This section is referenced in § 31-5031.04.

Section References

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2164 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation